Utah statutes.
7-1-714.   Judicial review of acts of commissioner -- Hearing by court.
(1)  Any person aggrieved by any rule, regulation, order, decision, or ruling
or other act or failure to act of the commissioner under this title is
entitled to judicial review.
(2)  Judicial review of other agency actions shall be governed by the
procedures and requirements of this subsection.
(a)  Within 30 days after receipt of notice of a rule, order, or other
decision or ruling not arising from an adjudicative proceeding, or within 120
days after the commissioner has failed to act upon a request or application,
the aggrieved person may file an application for judicial review with a court
of competent jurisdiction in the county in which the applicant is located, or
in the county where the office of the commissioner is located, and may request
an immediate hearing on the act or failure to act.
(b)  The court shall require adequate notice to be served on the commissioner
and all other interested parties and shall give the petition for review
precedence on its calendar.
(c)  The court shall review the record before the commissioner and shall
adjudicate the question, enter appropriate orders, and enforce them.
(d)  The court may declare void any rule, regulation, order, decision, ruling,
or other act of the commissioner it finds to be arbitrary, capricious, an
abuse of discretion, or otherwise contrary to law.
(3)  Any action for judicial review of acts or failure to act of the
commissioner shall be heard by the court and shall be based on the record made
before the department.
